API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS ්ාෘුැූෑිීෙේෛොෝෞෘෲෟෳංඃ

COMPOUNDFLAG 9
COMPOUNDMIN 1
FLAG num
SFX 10 Y 63
SFX 10 0 ව  .
SFX 10 0 වත්  .
SFX 10 0 වයි  .
SFX 10 0 වය  .
SFX 10 0 වක්  .
SFX 10 0 වකුත්  .
SFX 10 0 වකි  .
SFX 10 0 වක්ය  .
SFX 10 0 වක  .
SFX 10 0 වකත්  .
SFX 10 0 වකයි  .
SFX 10 0 වට  .
SFX 10 0 වටත්  .
SFX 10 0 වටයි  .
SFX 10 0 වටය  .
SFX 10 0 වකට  .
SFX 10 0 වකටත්  .
SFX 10 0 වකටයි  .
SFX 10 0 වකටය  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙන්  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙනුත්  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙනි  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙන්ය  .
SFX 10 0 වකගෙන්  .
SFX 10 0 වකගෙනුත්  .
SFX 10 0 වකගෙනි  .
SFX 10 0 වකගෙන්ය  .
SFX 10 0 වගේ  .
SFX 10 0 වගේත්  .
SFX 10 0 වගේයි  .
SFX 10 0 වගේය  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙ  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙත්  .
SFX 10 0 වගෙයි  .
SFX 10 0 වකගේ  .
SFX 10 0 වකගේත්  .
SFX 10 0 වකගේයි  .
SFX 10 0 වකගේය  .
SFX 10 0 වෝ  .
SFX 10 0 වෝත්  .
SFX 10 0 වෝයි  .
SFX 10 0 වෝය  .
SFX 10 0 වො  .
SFX 10 0 වොත්  .
SFX 10 0 වොයි  .
SFX 10 0 වොය  .
SFX 10 0 වන්   .
SFX 10 0 වනුත්   .
SFX 10 0 වනුයි   .
SFX 10 0 වන්ය   .
SFX 10 0 වන්ට  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ටත්  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ටයි  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ටය  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගේ  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගේත්  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගේයි  .
SFX 10 0 වන්ගේය  .
SFX 10 0 වනි  .
SFX 11 Y 61
SFX 11 0 ත්  .
SFX 11 0 යි  .
SFX 11 0 ය  .
SFX 11 0 ක්  .
SFX 11 0 කුත්  .
SFX 11 0 කි  .
SFX 11 0 ක්ය  .
SFX 11 0 ක  .
SFX 11 0 කත්  .
SFX 11 0 කයි  .
SFX 11 0 ට  .
SFX 11 0 ටත්  .
SFX 11 0 ටයි  .
SFX 11 0 ටය  .
SFX 11 0 කට  .
SFX 11 0 කටත්  .
SFX 11 0 කටයි  .
SFX 11 0 කටය  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙනි  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 11 0 කගෙන්  .
SFX 11 0 කගෙනුත්  .
SFX 11 0 කගෙනි  .
SFX 11 0 කගෙන්ය  .
SFX 11 0 ගේ  .
SFX 11 0 ගේත්  .
SFX 11 0 ගේයි  .
SFX 11 0 ගේය  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 11 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 11 0 කගේ  .
SFX 11 0 කගේත්  .
SFX 11 0 කගේයි  .
SFX 11 0 කගේය  .
SFX 11 0 ෝ  .
SFX 11 0 ෝත්  .
SFX 11 0 ෝයි  .
SFX 11 0 ෝය  .
SFX 11 0 ො  .
SFX 11 0 ොත්  .
SFX 11 0 ොයි  .
SFX 11 0 ොය  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්  .
SFX 11 0 ුනුත්  .
SFX 11 0 ුනි  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ය  .
SFX 11 0 ුනට  .
SFX 11 0 ුනටත්  .
SFX 11 0 ුනටයි  .
SFX 11 0 ුනටය  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගේ  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගේත්  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගේයි  .
SFX 11 0 ුන්ගේය  .
SFX 12 Y 71
SFX 12 ි ී  .
SFX 12 0 ය  .
SFX 12 0 යත්  .
SFX 12 0 යයි  .
SFX 12 0 යය  .
SFX 12 0 යක්  .
SFX 12 0 යකුත්  .
SFX 12 0 යකි  .
SFX 12 0 යක්ය  .
SFX 12 0 යක  .
SFX 12 0 යකත්  .
SFX 12 0 යකයි  .
SFX 12 0 යකය  .
SFX 12 0 යට  .
SFX 12 0 යටත්  .
SFX 12 0 යටයි  .
SFX 12 0 යටය  .
SFX 12 0 යකට  .
SFX 12 0 යකටත්  .
SFX 12 0 යකටයි  .
SFX 12 0 යකටය  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙන්  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙනුත්  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙනි  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙන්ය  .
SFX 12 0 යකගෙන්  .
SFX 12 0 යකගෙනුත්  .
SFX 12 0 යකගෙනි  .
SFX 12 0 යකගෙන්ය  .
SFX 12 0 යගේ  .
SFX 12 0 යගේත්  .
SFX 12 0 යගේයි  .
SFX 12 0 යගේය  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙ  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙත්  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙයි  .
SFX 12 0 යගෙය  .
SFX 12 0 යකගේ  .
SFX 12 0 යකගේත්  .
SFX 12 0 යකගේයි  .
SFX 12 0 යකගේය  .
SFX 12 0 යේ  .
SFX 12 0 යෝ  .
SFX 12 0 යෝත්  .
SFX 12 0 යෝයි  .
SFX 12 0 යෝය  .
SFX 12 0 යො  .
SFX 12 0 යොත්  .
SFX 12 0 යොයි  .
SFX 12 0 යොය  .
SFX 12 0 යන්  .
SFX 12 0 යනුත්  .
SFX 12 0 යනුයි  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ය  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ට  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ටත්  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ටයි  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ටය  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගේ  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගේත්  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගේයි  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගේය  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙ  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙත්  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙයි  .
SFX 12 0 යන්ගෙය  .
SFX 12 0 යනි  .
SFX 13 Y 70
SFX 13 0 ය  .
SFX 13 0 යත්  .
SFX 13 0 යයි  .
SFX 13 0 යය  .
SFX 13 0 යක්  .
SFX 13 0 යකුත්  .
SFX 13 0 යකි  .
SFX 13 0 යක්ය  .
SFX 13 0 යක  .
SFX 13 0 යකත්  .
SFX 13 0 යකයි  .
SFX 13 0 යකය  .
SFX 13 0 යට  .
SFX 13 0 යටත්  .
SFX 13 0 යටයි  .
SFX 13 0 යටය  .
SFX 13 0 යකට  .
SFX 13 0 යකටත්  .
SFX 13 0 යකටයි  .
SFX 13 0 යකටය  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙන්  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙනුත්  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙනි  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙන්ය  .
SFX 13 0 යකගෙන්  .
SFX 13 0 යකගෙනුත්  .
SFX 13 0 යකගෙනි  .
SFX 13 0 යකගෙන්ය  .
SFX 13 0 යගේ  .
SFX 13 0 යගේත්  .
SFX 13 0 යගේයි  .
SFX 13 0 යගේය  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙ  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙත්  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙයි  .
SFX 13 0 යගෙය  .
SFX 13 0 යකගේ  .
SFX 13 0 යකගේත්  .
SFX 13 0 යකගේයි  .
SFX 13 0 යකගේය  .
SFX 13 0 යේ  .
SFX 13 0 යෝ  .
SFX 13 0 යෝත්  .
SFX 13 0 යෝයි  .
SFX 13 0 යෝය  .
SFX 13 0 යො  .
SFX 13 0 යොත්  .
SFX 13 0 යොයි  .
SFX 13 0 යොය  .
SFX 13 0 යන්  .
SFX 13 0 යනුත්  .
SFX 13 0 යනුයි  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ය  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ට  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ටත්  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ටයි  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ටය  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගේ  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගේත්  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගේයි  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගේය  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙ  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙත්  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙයි  .
SFX 13 0 යන්ගෙය  .
SFX 13 0 යනි  .
SFX 14 Y 90
SFX 14 0 ා  .
SFX 14 0 ාත්  .
SFX 14 0 ායි  .
SFX 14 0 ාය  .
SFX 14 0 ත්  .
SFX 14 0 යි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙක්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 14 0  ෙකුයි  .
SFX 14 0  ෙකුය  .
SFX 14 0 ාට  .
SFX 14 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 14 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 14 0 ාටය  .
SFX 14 0 ට  .
SFX 14 0 ටත්  .
SFX 14 0 ටයි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුටය  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙන්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙන්  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙනි  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙන්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 14 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 14 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 14 0 ාගේය  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙ  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙත්  .
SFX 14 0 ාගෙයි  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 14 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගේය  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙ  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙත්  .
SFX 14 0 ෙකුගෙයි  .
SFX 14 0 ේ  .
SFX 14 0 ලා  .
SFX 14 0 ලාත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලායි  .
SFX 14 0 ලාය  .
SFX 14 0 ල  .
SFX 14 0 ලත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලය  .
SFX 14 0 ලාට  .
SFX 14 0 ලාටත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලාටයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලාටය  .
SFX 14 0 ලට  .
SFX 14 0 ලටත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලටයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලටය  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙන්  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙනි  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙන්  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙනුත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙනි  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙන්ය  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගේ  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගේත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගේයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලාගේය  .
SFX 14 0 ලගේ  .
SFX 14 0 ලගේත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලගේයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලගේය  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙ  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙත්  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙයි  .
SFX 14 0 ලගෙය  .
SFX 15 Y 85
SFX 15 0 ා  .
SFX 15 0 ාත්  .
SFX 15 0 ායි  .
SFX 15 0 ාය  .
SFX 15 0 ත්  .
SFX 15 0 යි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙක්ය  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුයි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුය  .
SFX 15 0 ාට  .
SFX 15 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 15 0 ාටය  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුටය  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙන්ය  .
SFX 15 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 15 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 15 0 ාගේය  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙ  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාගෙයි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගේය  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙ  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙත්  .
SFX 15 0 ෙකුගෙයි  .
SFX 15 0 නි  .
SFX 15 0 ාලා   .
SFX 15 0 ාලාත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාලායි  .
SFX 15 0 ාලාය  .
SFX 15 0 ාල  .
SFX 15 0 ාලත්  .
SFX 15 0 ාලයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලා   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාත්   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලායි   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ල   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලත්   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලයි   .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාට  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාටත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාටයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාටය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලට  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලටත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලටයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගෙන්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගෙනි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගෙන්ය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙන්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙනුත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙනි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙන්ය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගේ  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගේත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගේයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාගේය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගේ  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගේත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගේයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගේය  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙ  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙත්  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලගෙයි  .
SFX 15 0 න්ලාණෙනි   .
