API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අග්‍රෝපස්ථායිකා/10,350,351
අග්‍රෝපාසිකා/10,350,351
අඞ්ගනා/10,350,351
අධ්‍යක්ෂිකා/10,350,351
අපේක්ෂිකා/10,350,351
අබිසරු/10,350,351
අභිරූපිකා/10
අම්බිකා/10
ආර්යා/10
උපදේශිකා/10
උපසූතිකා/10
උපාසිකා/10
ඒකභාර්යා/10
කථානායිකා/10
කලටා/10
කාමධේනු/10
කුලංගනා/10
ක්‍රිඩිකා/10
ක්ෂීරදායිකා/10
ගන්ධවධු/10
ගුරුමාතා/10
ගෝපිකාංගනා/10
ඝටචේටිකා/10
චෝදිකා/10
ජලාංගනා/10
දායිකා/10
දිව්‍යාඞ්ගනා/10
දූතිකා/10
දෙව්දු/10
දේවමාතා/10
නාටිකාංගනා/10
නාට්‍යාංගනා/10
නිරූපිකා/10
පරිචාරිකා/10
පරිවර්තිකා/10
පාලිකා/10
පෞරාඞ්ගනා/10
ප‍්‍රතිහාරිකා/10
ප‍්‍රාණනායිකා/10
ප්‍රියා/10
බවලතා/10
බාලදක්ෂිකා/10
බිසො/10
භාර්යා/10
මධුමත්තා/10
මහිලා/10
මාණවිකා/10
මානවිකා/10
මායියා/10
රචිකා/10
රාජාඞ්ගනා/10
ලාසිකා/10
ලේඛිකා/10
වනිතා/10
වරාංගනා/10
වාමලෝචනා/10
විධවා/10
වින්නඹු/10
වෘද්ධා/10
වේශ්‍යාඞ්ගනා/10
වෛශ්‍යා/10
ශබරාඞ්ගනා/10
ශික්ෂමාණා/10
ශ්‍රාවිකා/10
සඛිභාර්යා/10
සාවිකා/10
සිදඹු/10
සිද්ධාඞ්ගනා/10
සුරංගනා/10
සුරභිධේනු/10
සූතිකා/10
සේව්‍යප‍්‍රියා/10
හිමිනඹු/10
අගබිසව/11
අඟන/11
අත්බඳ/11
අත්බර/11
අබිසර/11
අමරඟන/11
අමරදෙන/11
අමරසර/11
ඇතින්න/11
උරඟන/11
උවිඳුකත/11
කමලඟන/11
කල්බඳ/11
කල්ල/11
කාකත/11
කිරිමව/11
කුලඟන/11
ගර්භිණය/11
ගවඟන/11
ගැබින්න/11
ගිණික/11
ඝරණය/11
තඹුරුකල/11
තිසරඟන/11
තුරඟදෙන/11
දනවුකලණ/11
දැස්ස/11
දුසඳ/11
දෙවඟන/11
දෙව්දෙන/11
නළඟන/11
නිසකත/11
නෙකත/11
පුරඟන/11
ප‍්‍රමදාරත්නය/11
මතවරඟන/11
මලඟන/11
මෑල්ල/11
මිහිකත/11
මීකත/11
යකින්න/11
යොවුනඟන/11
යොවුනඹ/11
රජකත/11
ලෙම්බ/11
වදනඟන/11
වරඹ/11
වාරඟන/11
වැලසින්න/11
වැලහින්න/11
වෙන්කත/11
වෙසඟන/11
සැපින්න/11
සිවකත/11
සුරබිදෙන/11
හරඟන/11
හසඟන/11
හෙර/11
කෙල්ල/11
බිසව/11
අගමැතිනි/12
අධිපතිනි/12
අම්මණ්ඩි/12
අවාසනාවන්ති/12
ආදරවන්ති/12
ඇමතිනි/12
ඉකිණි/12
එකි/12
කප්පකන්නි/12
කලාකාරිනි/12
කිකිළි/12
කිරිල්ලි/12
කුමාරි/12
ගර්භණි/12
ගුරුතුමි/12
ගෘහපතිනි/12
ගෝමරි/12
ජනාධිපතිනි/12
ඩාකිනි/12
තැනැත්ති/12
දාසි/12
දුග්ධවති/12
දුහිණි/12
දේවතාවි/12
ධර්මචාරිනි/12
නාකිච්චි/12
නැට්ටුක්කාරි/12
නියෝජිතවරි/12
පංගුකාරි/12
පත්තිනි/12
පැමිණිලිකාරි/12
පින්වන්ති/12
පූජකවරි/12
පෙම්වන්ති/12
භික්ෂුණි/12
මව්තුමි/12
මායාකාරි/12
මිනිබිරි/12
මෙහෙකාරි/12
මෝඩි/12
යකින්නි/12
යක්ෂණි/12
යෞවනි/12
රසවති/12
රාජිනි/12
වාදකාරි/12
වාර්තාකාරි/12
වැඳිරි/12
වැලහින්නි/12
විදුහල්පතිතුමි/12
විදුහල්පතිවරි/12
විලාසිනි/12
වීරසිරි/12
ව්‍යභිචාරිණි/12
ශෝභිනි/12
සභාපතිනි/12
සරස්වති/12
සහෝදරි/12
සිඟිත්ති/12
සිල්මෑණි/12
සුරඟනාවි/12
සුරූපිනි/12
සොයුරි/12
සෝදිසිකාරි/12
ස්ත්‍රීවාදිනි/12
ස්ථානාධිපතිනි/12
හැතිරි/12
හිතවති/12
හිතුවක්කාරි/12
හිරකාරි/12
ළමාතැනි/12
රැජිනි /12
අත්වැදවි/13
අත්වැදෑවි/13
අදිති/13
ඇතිනි/13
ඇඹෙණි/13
ඇඹේණි/13
ඉසදි/13
ඉහදි/13
උරඟලි/13
උවැසි/13
කම්කිළි/13
කම්වමි/13
කාමිනි/13
කැවිඩි/13
කිවිඳි/13
කුට්ටනි/13
කුති/13
කුලවමි/13
කෙකිනි/13
කෙඹි/13
කෙවිලි/13
ගරුගර්භිණි/13
ගැතිමිඩි/13
ගැබිනි/13
ගැබිලි/13
ගැහැනි/13
ගැහැවිනි/13
ගෑනි/13
ගිණි/13
ගිරවි/13
ගෙවිලි/13
ඝරදාසි/13
ථෙරි/13
දාරි/13
දැරි/13
දිගැසි/13
දෙවැනි/13
දේවි/13
දෝලි/13
නෑම්බි/13
නුවන්තුන්ලි/13
පත්නි/13
බැමිණි/13
භික්ෂුණි/13
මණාලි/13
මධුරභාෂිණි/13
මන්යොන්ලි/13
මානිනි/13
මැතිනි/13
මැහැල්ලි/13
මිඬි/13
මූදේවි/13
මෙණෙවි/13
මෙහෙණි/13
යෙහෙළි/13
රදලි/13
රාක්ෂසි/13
රාජස්ත‍්‍රි/13
රුචිරානනි/13
ලේලි/13
වරවමි/13
විරහිනි/13
සඛි/13
සත්පත්තිනි/13
සහකාරි/13
සාමණේරි/13
සැපිනි/13
සිරිබරි/13
සිසුවි/13
සොහොයුරි/13
ස්ථවිරි/13
හෙදි/13
මිය/13
අක්ක/14
අක්කම්ම/14
අත්ත/14
අත්තප්ප/14
අත්තම්ම/14
අනුජය/14
අපුච්ච/14
අප්ප/14
අප්පුච්ච/14
අම්ම/14
අයිය/14
ආත/14
ආතම්ම/14
ආත්ත/14
ආත්තම්ම/14
ආය/14
ඇවැස්සය/14
කිත්ත/14
කිරිඅප්ප/14
කිරිඅම්ම/14
කිරිකෑමුත්ත/14
කිරිකිත්ත/14
කුඩප්ප/14
කුඩම්ම/14
ජන්‍යය/14
ජාරය/14
තාත්ත/14
දෙමුනුපුර/14
දෙමුනුබුර/14
නත්ත/14
නැන්ද/14
නැන්දම්ම/14
නෑන/14
නෝන/14
පනත්ත/14
පප්ප/14
බාප්ප/14
බාලම්ම/14
බැහැන/14
බෑණ/14
බෑන/14
මම්ම/14
මල්බෑය/14
මස්සින/14
මහපිය/14
මහප්ප/14
මහම්ම/14
මාම/14
මායිය/14
මීමුත්ත/14
මුණුපර/14
මුණුබුර/14
මුත්ත/14
මුනුපුර/14
මුනුබුර/14
ශ්‍යාලය/14
සසුරය/14
සීය/14
සුහුර/14
සූරුබඩුව/14
හූර/14
කෙන/14
අගමැතිතුම/15
අගවිනිසුරුතුම/15
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම /15
අදිකාරම්තුම/15
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම/15
අධිපතිතුම/15
ආචාර්යතුම/15
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම/15
ආදිපාදතුම/15
ඇදුරුතුම/15
ඇමතිතුම/15
උතුම/15
එතුම/15
කථානායකතුම/15
ගුරුතුම/15
ජෙනරාල්තුම/15
ජනාධිපතිතුම/15
තුම/15
නායකතුම/15
පඬිතුම/15
පියතුම/15
පූජකතුම/15
බිෂොප්තුම/15
මන්ත්‍රීතුම/15
මැතිතුම/15
මුදලිතුම/15
මෙතුම/15
රජතුම/15
විද්‍යාලයාධිපතිතුම/15
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම/15
විපක්ෂනායකතුම/15
හමුදාපතිතුම/15
එක/15
මහත/15
